Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 1. General Powers.
Sec. 29.35.134.
Multi-line telephone systems.

A municipality may by ordinance require a multi-line telephone system operator to comply with this section if, after January 1, 2019, the system operator

upgrades an existing multi-line telephone system; or

installs a new multi-line telephone system.

The operator of a multi-line telephone system that is required to comply with this section shall ensure that the system

allows a caller to call 911 by dialing 911 directly without an additional code, digit, prefix, postfix, or trunk-access code;

for every 911 call made using the system, provides to the public safety answering point receiving the call verified automated number and location information for the call, including

the street name, valid address, and business name, if applicable;

the direct callback telephone number;

the office, unit, or building number, as applicable;

the room number or equivalent designation;

if the multi-line telephone system operates for a building that has more than one floor, the building floor;

if the multi-line telephone system operates for more than one building, the

building number or equivalent designation; and

building floor; and

has a location database that stores the information required under (2) of this subsection and that the system is updated

as soon as practicable after the system is installed; and

within one business day after completion of any changes made to the system or the physical characteristics of the facility where the system is used; this subparagraph does not apply to changes incurred during the installation of the system.

Information in a location database created under (b)(3) of this section

is owned by the multi-line telephone system operator that supplied the information;

may not be shared, except as required by law; and

may not be used by a public safety answering point for any purpose except to facilitate an emergency response to a 911 call.

The operator of a multi-line telephone system that is not required by ordinance to comply with this section and that does not allow for direct 911 dialing shall post, in a visible place not more than five feet from each telephone that is connected to the multi-line telephone system, a notice that

states that 911 services cannot be accessed by dialing 911 directly on the telephone;

indicates how a caller may access 911 services through the telephone;

is printed in contrasting colors in a bold font not smaller than 16 points;

includes the following information, as applicable, about the location of the telephone:

the street address and business name;

the office, unit, or building number;

the room number or equivalent designation.

In this section,

“multi-line telephone system” includes

a network or premises-based telephone system

installed at an end-use location that uses common control units, common telephone, and common control hardware and software to provide a connection to the public;

such as Centrex, Voice over Internet Protocol, and PBX, Hybrid, and Key Telephone Systems, as classified by the Federal Communications Commission under 47 C.F.R. Part 68 requirements; and

systems owned or leased by government agencies and nonprofit and for-profit entities;

“multi-line telephone system operator” means an entity that owns, leases, or rents from a third party, and operates a multi-line telephone system by which a caller may place a 911 call through a public switched network.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2005; am §§ 1, 2 ch 90 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective November 21, 2018, rewrote (a), added (b) – (e).

Sec. 29.35.135.
Waiver of privacy by local exchange telephone company subscribers.

Local exchange telephone company subscribers waive the privacy afforded by unlisted or unpublished telephone numbers to the extent that the name and address associated with the telephone number may be furnished to the enhanced 911 system for call routing or for automatic retrieval of location information in response to a call initiated to the system.

History.

(§ 4 ch 57 SLA 1993)

Sec. 29.35.137.
Definitions.

In AS

29.35.131

—

29.35.137

,

“enhanced 911 equipment” means the equipment dedicated to the operation of, or use in, the establishment, operation, or maintenance of an enhanced 911 system, including customer premises equipment, automatic number identification or automatic location identification controllers and display units, printers, cathode ray tubes, recorders, software, and other essential communication equipment required by the system;

“enhanced 911 service area” means the area within a municipality’s jurisdiction that has been designated to receive enhanced 911 service; the designation of an area to receive an enhanced 911 system under AS

29.35.131(a)

does not designate the area as a “service area” for purposes of art. X, sec. 5, Constitution of the State of Alaska;

“enhanced 911 system” means a telephone system consisting of network, database, and enhanced 911 equipment that uses the single three digit number, 911, for reporting a police, fire, medical, or other emergency situation, and that enables the users of a public telephone system to reach a public safety answering point to report emergencies by dialing 911; an enhanced 911 system includes the personnel required to acquire, install, operate, and maintain the system and its facilities and to dispatch the calls generated by the system;

“local exchange access line” means a telephone line that connects a local exchange service customer to the local exchange telephone company switching office and has the capability of reaching local public safety agencies, but does not include a line used by a carrier to provide interexchange services;

“local exchange service” means the transmission of two-way interactive switched voice communications furnished by a local exchange telephone company within a local exchange area, including access to enhanced 911 systems; in this paragraph, “local exchange area” means a geographic area encompassing one or more political subdivisions as described in maps, tariffs, or rate schedules filed with the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, where local exchange rates apply;

“local exchange telephone company” means a telephone utility certificated under AS 42.05 to provide local exchange service;

“municipality” has the meaning given in AS

29.71.800

and includes a public corporation established by a municipality and a village as that term is defined in AS

09.65.070(e)

;

“public safety answering point” means a 24-hour local jurisdiction communications facility that receives 911 service calls and directly dispatches emergency response services or that relays calls to the appropriate public or private safety agency;

“wireless telephone” means a telephone that is not a wireline telephone and includes cellular and mobile telephones; each wireless telephone number is considered to be a separate wireless telephone;

“wireless telephone company” means a telephone utility that provides telephone service for wireless telephone customers who receive monthly or periodic bills sent to an address within a designated enhanced 911 service area;

“wireline telephone” means a telephone that uses a local exchange access line.

History.

(§ 4 ch 57 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 25 SLA 1999; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 82 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1993, the statutory reference in paragraph (2) was changed to correct a manifest error in ch. 57, SLA 1993.

In 1999, in paragraph (5) “Regulatory Commission of Alaska” was substituted for “Alaska Public Utilities Commission” in accordance with § 30(a), ch. 25, SLA 1999.

Reorganized in 2001 to maintain alphabetical order.

Sec. 29.35.138.
Application.

AS

29.35.131

—

29.35.137

apply to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 5 ch 55 SLA 2005)

Sec. 29.35.140.
Regulation of transportation carriers.

A municipality may not regulate an activity regarding transportation of passengers or freight for hire if the regulation conflicts with the regulation of that activity by the Alaska Transportation Commission as the regulation existed on April 1, 1983, under former AS 02.05, former AS 42.07, or former AS 42.10.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section derived from [former] AS 29.48.036, enacted by § 2, 1983 Initiative Proposal No. 2.

Sec. 29.35.141.
Regulation of radio antennas.

A municipality that regulates the placement, screening, or height of radio antennas must reasonably accommodate amateur radio antennas. A municipality may require reasonable and customary engineering practices to be followed in the erection of amateur radio antennas. A municipality may impose only the minimum requirements relating to amateur radio antennas that are necessary to accomplish the legitimate purposes intended to be served by the requirements.

A municipality may not restrict the number of support structures for an amateur radio antenna. Based on the most recently published United States census, a municipal restriction on amateur radio antenna height may not be lower than

200 feet above ground level as permitted by the Federal Communications Commission in an area with a population density of 120 or less per square mile;

75 feet above ground level in an area with a population density of more than 120 per square mile for an antenna on a lot that is smaller than one acre; or

140 feet above ground level in an area with a population density of more than 120 per square mile for an antenna on a lot that is one acre or larger.

Subject to (a) and (b) of this section, a municipality may, by ordinance, impose requirements to meet clearly defined objectives relating to screening, placement, aesthetic, and health and safety factors with respect to the erection, maintenance, and operation of amateur radio antennas.

An ordinance regulating or restricting radio antennas adopted under this section may not apply to a radio antenna that was erected before July 26, 2001.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 2 ch 19 SLA 2001)

Sec. 29.35.144.
Sprinkler systems in certain residential buildings.

Except as provided by (b) of this section, a municipality may not require a sprinkler fire protection system to be included in the construction of all new single-family residential buildings or in the construction of all new residential buildings with not more than two dwelling units.

A municipality may, by ordinance, require a sprinkler fire protection system to be included in the construction of all new single-family residential buildings, in the construction of all new residential buildings with not more than two dwelling units, or in both types of buildings. Before adopting an ordinance to implement this subsection, or before amending an ordinance to extend its coverage to residential buildings described in this subsection, in addition to complying with the other requirements relating to the adoption of an ordinance, the governing body of the municipality shall

notwithstanding the publication requirement in AS

29.25.020(b)(3)

or a comparable notice publication requirement of a home rule municipality, at least 30 days before the first scheduled public hearing for the ordinance, publish

a summary of the ordinance or ordinance amendment; and

a notice of the time and place of each scheduled public hearing on the proposed ordinance or amendment; and

notwithstanding the public hearing schedule requirement of AS

29.25.020(b)(6)

or comparable public hearing scheduling requirement of a home rule municipality, schedule at least three public hearings on the proposed ordinance or ordinance amendment to be held within a period of not less than 60 days and not more than 180 days.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 2 ch 26 SLA 2011)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 26, SLA 2011, which enacted this section, took effect on October 11, 2011.

Sec. 29.35.145.
Regulation of firearms and knives.

The authority to regulate firearms and knives is reserved to the state, and, except as specifically provided by statute, a municipality may not enact or enforce an ordinance regulating the possession, ownership, sale, transfer, use, carrying, transportation, licensing, taxation, or registration of firearms or knives.

Municipalities may enact and enforce ordinances

that are identical to state law and that have the same penalty as provided for by state law;

restricting the discharge of firearms in any portion of their respective jurisdictions where there is a reasonable likelihood that people, domestic animals, or property will be jeopardized; ordinances enacted or enforced under this paragraph may not abridge the right of the individual guaranteed by art. I, sec. 19, Constitution of the State of Alaska, to bear arms in defense of self or others;

restricting the areas in their respective jurisdictions in which firearms or knives may be sold; a business selling firearms or knives may not be treated more restrictively than other businesses located within the same zone; and

prohibiting the possession of firearms or knives in the restricted access area of municipal government buildings; the municipal assembly shall post notice of the prohibition against possession of firearms or knives at each entrance to the restricted access area.

The prohibition on taxation in (a) of this section does not include imposition of a sales tax that is levied on all products sold within a municipality.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

In this section,

“firearms” includes firearms, or any other element relating to firearms or parts thereof including ammunition and reloading components;

“restricted access area” means the area beyond a secure point where visitors are screened and does not include common areas of ingress and egress open to the general public.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 2, 3 ch 82 SLA 2005; am §§ 5, 6 ch 54 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was enacted as subsection (c), subsection (c) was enacted as subsection (e), subsection (d) was formerly subsection (b), and subsection (e) was enacted as subsection (d).
Relettered in 2005. In 2008, in paragraph (b)(3), “than” was substituted for “that” to correct a manifest error.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective September 18, 2013, in (a) inserted “or knives” following “firearms” two times; in (b)(3) and (b)(4) inserted “or knives” following “firearms” four times.

Sec. 29.35.146.
Regulation of unmanned aircraft systems.

A municipality may not adopt an ordinance that permits the release of images captured by an unmanned aircraft system in a manner inconsistent with AS

18.65.903

.

In this section, “unmanned aircraft system” has the meaning given in AS

18.65.909

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 105 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 105, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, took effect October 26, 2014.

Sec. 29.35.147.
Licensing of massage therapists.

The authority to license massage therapists is reserved to the state, and, except as specifically provided by statute, a municipality may not enact or enforce an ordinance requiring professional licensure of massage therapists.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 7 ch 114 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

29.35.146

; renumbered in 2014.

Effective dates. —

Section 14, ch. 114, SLA 2014 makes this section effective July 1, 2015.

Sec. 29.35.148.
Regulation of transportation network companies or drivers.

The authority to regulate transportation network companies and transportation network company drivers is reserved to the state, and, except as specifically provided by statute, a municipality may not enact or enforce an ordinance regulating transportation network companies or transportation network company drivers.

The prohibition on regulation under (a) of this section does not include

imposition of a municipal sales tax on a transportation network company driver that taxes a trip originating in the municipality in the same manner that other services are taxed in the municipality; in imposing a sales tax as permitted by this paragraph, a municipality may require the transportation network company to collect and pay the municipal sales tax on behalf of transportation network company drivers;

a municipal traffic ordinance.

Notwithstanding AS

28.01.010

or (a) of this section, a municipality may by ordinance ratified by the voters in a regular municipal election prohibit transportation network companies from conducting activities under AS 28.23 within the municipality.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

In this section,

“transportation network company” has the meaning given in AS

28.23.180

;

“transportation network company driver” has the meaning given in AS

28.23.180

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 10 SLA 2017; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective June 19, 2018, added “; in imposing a sales tax as permitted by this paragraph, a municipality may require the transportation network company to collect and pay the municipal sales tax on behalf of transportation network company drivers” at the end of (b)(1).

Effective dates. —

Section 8, ch. 10, SLA 2017 makes this section effective June 16, 2017, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 29.35.149.
Regulation of dextromethorphan.

The authority to regulate dextromethorphan is reserved to the state, and, except as specifically provided by statute, a municipality may not enact or enforce an ordinance regulating the possession or sale of dextromethorphan.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 3 ch 16 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Although the enactment of this section was to have taken effect May 1, 2016 under § 4, ch. 16, SLA 2016, the governor did not sign the bill until June 2, 2016, and so the actual effective date of this section was June 3, 2016, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.